GRAMMARS/SPANISH/FST2/src/lex-org.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8 é à ñ
!# CONTENT:     organisation names
!#
!# LANGUAGE:    SPANISH
!#
!# CREATED:	04-Aug-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================


Multichar_Symbols

+Prop 
+Org
+Soc
+Company
+Admin
+Acron


+Sg +Pl +SP
+Masc +Fem +MF

+Acron 

!# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
!# Continuation classes

LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;

LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

!# plural = singular
LEXICON MSP	+Masc+SP	#;
LEXICON FSP	+Fem+SP		#;
LEXICON MFSP	MSP; FSP;

!# masc = fem
LEXICON XSG	+MF+Sg		#;
LEXICON XPL	+MF+Pl		#;
LEXICON XSGPL	XSG; XPL;

!# masc = fem; plural = singular
LEXICON XSP	+MF+SP		#;

!# =============================================================================
!# MAIN LEXICON
!# =============================================================================

LEXICON ROOT
ACNUR+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
ACR+Prop+Org							XSP;
Actia% Videobus% SA.+Prop+Org+Company				FSG;	!@
ADI+Prop+Org							XSP;
Aeroméxico+Prop+Org+Company					FSG;
AIF+Prop+Org+Acron						FSG;
Alcubilla% 2000% Sl+Prop+Org+Company				FSG;	!@
Alianza% de% Acción% Anticomunista+Prop+Org			XSP;
Alianza% Republicana% Nacionalista+Prop+Org			XSP;
Altadis% SA.+Prop+Org+Company					FSG;	!@
And% y% Or% SA.+Prop+Org+Company				FSG;	!@
Anticommunist% Action% Alliance+Prop+Org			XSP;
APEEF+Prop+Org+Acron						FSG;
Arisa% SA.+Prop+Org+Company					FSG;	!@
ASEAN+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
Asociación% de% Ganaderos% de% Magdalena% Central+Prop+Org	XSP;
ASTTEL+Prop+Org+Acron						FSG;
Auto-Defensa% de% Los% Trabajadores+Prop+Org			XSP;
Azulejos% Sanchis% SL.+Prop+Org+Company				FSG;	!@
Bancobao+Prop+Org+Company						MSG;
Banda% de% John% Bolños% López+Prop+Org				XSP;
Bandesco+Prop+Org+Company						MSG;
Banibao+Prop+Org+Company						MSG;
Bankunión+Prop+Org+Company						MSG;
BBVA+Prop+Company+Acron						MSG; 	! banco
BERD+Prop+Company+Acron						MSG;
Bfi% Optilas% SA.+Prop+Org+Company				FSG;	!@
BID+Prop+Company+Acron						MSG;
BIRF+Prop+Company+Acron						MSG;
BNG+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
Bp% Solar% España% SA.+Prop+Org+Company				FSG;	!@
CAFENASTRAS+Prop+Org+Acron					MSG;
Calzados% Danubio% SL.+Prop+Org+Company				FSG;	!@
Campofrío+Prop+Org+Company					MSG;
Cártel% de% Cali+Prop+Org					XSP;
Cártel% de% Medellín+Prop+Org					XSP;
Casa% Vigar% SL.+Prop+Org+Company				FSG;	!@
CCAN+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
CC% OO+Prop+Org+Acron						FPL;
CC.OO+Prop+Org+Acron						FPL;
CCTO+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
CECSA+Prop+Company+Acron						FSG;
CENIDE+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
CENTRU+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
CE+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
CEPSA+Prop+Company+Acron						FSG;
CESI+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
CGIL+Prop+Org+Acron						FSG;
CHA+Prop+Org+Acron						XSG;
Chiquilín+Prop+Org+Company					MSG;	
CICR+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
CIES+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
CIMA+Prop+Org+Acron						FSG;
CIM+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
Cinchoneros+Prop+Org						XSP;
Clarín+Prop+Org+Company						MSG;
CMOPE+Prop+Org+Acron						FSG;
Codorniu+Prop+Org+Company					MSG;
COE+Prop+Org+Acron						FPL;
COI+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
Comagra% de% Congelacion% SA.+Prop+Org+Company			FSG;	!@
Comité% de% Prensa% de% Las% Fuerzas% Armadas+Prop+Org		XSP;
Compañia% Envasadora% Loreto% SA.+Prop+Org+Company		FSG;	!@
Comunicacion% 1% SA.+Prop+Org+Company				FSG;	!@
Consorcio% Español% Conservero% SA.+Prop+Org+Company		FSG;	!@
Coordinadora% Guerrillera% Simón% Bolívar+Prop+Org		XSP;
Coordinadora% Nacional% Guerrillera% Simón% Bolívar+Prop+Org	XSP;
COPEI+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
CPDH+Prop+Org+Acron						FSG;
CPT+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
Cruzcampo+Prop+Org+Company					XSG;
CSIC+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
CTN+Prop+Org+Acron						FSG;
Delphi-Automotive% Systems% España% SL.+Prop+Org+Company	FSG;	!@
Departamento% Administrativo% de% Seguridad+Prop+Org		XSP;
Destacamento% Militar% de% Ingenieros% de% Las% Fuerzas% Armadas+Prop+Org	XSP;
Destacamento% Militar% Número% 4+Prop+Org			XSP;
Dicesva% SL.+Prop+Org+Company					FSG;	!@
Drug% Enforcement% Agency+Prop+Org				XSP;
Eads% Telecom% España% SA.+Prop+Org+Company			FSG;	!@
EAJ+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
EAU+Prop+Org+Acron						MPL;
Editorial% Libsa% SA.+Prop+Org+Company				FSG;	!@
EI% AI+Prop+Company+Acron						FPL;
EIA+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
Ejército% de% Liberación% Nacional+Prop+Org			XSP;
Ejército% de% Liberación% Nacional-Unión% Camilista+Prop+Org	XSP;
Ejército% Guerrillero% Del% Pueblo% Pobre+Prop+Org		XSP;
Ejército% Popular% de% Liberación+Prop+Org			XSP;
Ejército% Popular% Sandinista+Prop+Org				XSP;
Electro% Crisol% Metal% SA.+Prop+Org+Company			FSG;	!@
EMK-MCE+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
ENDASA+Prop+Company+Acron						FSG;
EPK-PCE+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
Equipe% Ceramicas% SL.+Prop+Org+Company				FSG;	!@
Euro% Ckp% SA.+Prop+Org+Company					FSG;	!@
Exbank+Prop+Org+Company							MSG;
Fabri-Kit% SL.+Prop+Org+Company					FSG;	!@
FAC+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
Fal-Zarate% Wilka% Group+Prop+Org				XSP;
FDC+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
Federación% Nacional% de% Sindicatos% de% Trabajadores% Salvadoreños+Prop+Org	XSP;
Feiraco+Prop+Org+Company					MSG;
FF% NN+Prop+Org+Acron						FPL;
Florencia% Marco% SL.+Prop+Org+Company				FSG;	!@
Foratom+Prop+Admin+Acron					MSG;
Frente% de% Liberación% Nacional% Farabundo% Martí+Prop+Org	XSP;
Frente% de% Liberación% Popular% Cinchonero+Prop+Org		XSP;
Frente% Patriótico% de% Liberación+Prop+Org			XSP;
Frente% Patriótico% Manuel% Rodríguez+Prop+Org			XSP;
Frente% Patriótico% Morazanista+Prop+Org			XSP;
Fuerzas% Armadas% de% Liberación% Zárate% Wilka+Prop+Org	FPL;
Fuerzas% Armadas% Rebeldes+Prop+Org				FPL;
Fuerzas% Armadas% Revolucionarias% de% Colombia+Prop+Org	FPL;
FARC+Prop+Org							FPL;
Fuerzas% de% Seguridad% Pública+Prop+Org			XSP;
Fuerzas% Populares% de% Liberación% 9% de% Mayo+Prop+Org	XSP;
Fundiciones% Caetano% SA.+Prop+Org+Company			FSG;	!@
Gerardo% Barrios% Commando% Unit+Prop+Org			XSP;
Graficas% de% Prensa% Diaria,% SA.+Prop+Org+Company		FSG;	!@
Grupo% de% Apoyo% Mutuo+Prop+Org				XSP;
Grupo% Zárate% Wilka+Prop+Org					XSP;
HB+Prop+Org							XSP;
Herramientas% de% Corte% G% L% G% SL.+Prop+Org+Company		FSG;	!@
IBRD+Prop+Company+Acron						MSG;
IDB+Prop+Company+Acron						MSG;
Igmapa% SL.+Prop+Org+Company					FSG;	!@
INAZUCAR+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
Industrias% Vinicolas% Del% Oeste% SA.+Prop+Org+Company		FSG;	!@
INPEP+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
Instituto% Nacional% del% Café+Prop+Org				XSP;
IOC+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
ISTA+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
Italfarmaco% SA.+Prop+Org+Company				FSG;	!@
JJ.SS+Prop+Org+Acron						FPL;
John% Bolanos% López% Gang+Prop+Org				XSP;
Kaiku+Prop+Org+Company						XSG;
Kenci,% SA.+Prop+Org+Company					FSG;	!@
LAN+Prop+Company+Acron						FPL;
Limit% Sport% SL.+Prop+Org+Company				FSG;	!@
Mahou+Prop+Org+Company						MSG;
Marfrio% SA.+Prop+Org+Company					FSG;	!@
Medellín% Drug% Cartel+Prop+Org					XSP;
MISK+Prop+Org							XSP;
MIT+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
Motorola% España% SA.+Prop+Org+Company				FSG;	!@
Movimiento% 19% de% Abril+Prop+Org				XSP;
Movimiento% 2% de% Diciembre+Prop+Org				XSP;
Movimiento% de% Liberación% Nacional% Farabundo% Martí+Prop+Org	XSP;
Movimiento% de% Liberación% Popular% Cinchonero+Prop+Org	XSP;
Movimiento% Popular% Companyial% Cristiano+Prop+Org			XSP;
Nobel% Sport% España% SA.+Prop+Org+Company			FSG;	!@
Organización% Revolucionaria% Del% Pueblo% En% Armas+Prop+Org	XSP;
Osborne+Prop+Org+Company					MSG;
Paco% Herrero% Export% S.L+Prop+Org+Company			FSG;	!@
Partido% Revolucionario% de% Los% Trabajadores+Prop+Org		XSP;
Partido% Social% Demócrata% de% Guatemala+Prop+Org		XSP;
Patria% Vasca% y% Libertad+Prop+Org				XSP;
Pizarras% Los% Tres% Cuñados% SA.+Prop+Org+Company		FSG;	!@
PNV+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
Poor% People's% Guerrilla% Army+Prop+Org			XSP;
Productos% y% Mangueras% Especiales% SA.+Prop+Org+Company	FSG;	!@
PSOE+Prop+Org+Acron  	     	     				MSG;		
Reunión% Bolivariana% del% Pueblo+Prop+Org			XSP;
Rials% Fabrica% Articulos% Caucho% SA.+Prop+Org+Company		FSG;	!@
Sankyo% Desarrollos% Tecnicos,% SL..+Prop+Org+Company		FSG;	!@
Santander+Prop+Org+Company					MSG;
Sendero% Luminoso+Prop+Org					XSP;
SETA+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
SICAFE+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
SIGEBAN+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
SITINPEP+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
SITRLONG+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
Ski% Comercial% I% SA.+Prop+Org+Company				FSG;	!@
SNTP+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
STITAS+Prop+Org+Acron						MSG;
Tecalum% SL.+Prop+Org+Company					FSG;	!@
The% Art% Company% B% &% S% SA.+Prop+Org+Company		FSG;	!@
Torres+Prop+Org+Company						XSG;
UITA+Prop+Org+Acron						FSG;
Unidad% de% Comando% Gerardo% Barrios+Prop+Org			XSP;
Unión% Camilista-Ejército% de% Liberación% Nacional+Prop+Org	XSP;
Unión% Cívica% Radical+Prop+Org					XSP;
Venceremos+Prop+Org						XSP;
Vidrios% Beniganim% Sal+Prop+Org+Company			FSG;	!@
Zarate-Wilka% Group+Prop+Org					XSP;
Cruz% Roja+Prop+Org+Admin				FSG;
KKK+Prop+Org+Acron					MSG;
